Utah statutes.
41-6a-1114.   Bicycles -- Lamps and reflective material required.

(1)  A bicycle in use or a person operating a bicycle at the times described in Section 41-6a-1603 shall be equipped with a:

(a)  forward facing lamp that emits a white light visible from a distance of at least 500 feet to the front; and

(b) (i)  rear facing red reflector that is visible for 500 feet when directly in front of lawful lower beams of head lamps on a motor vehicle; or

(ii)  rear facing red lamp that is designed for use on a bicycle and that emits flashing or nonflashing light visible from a distance of 500 feet to the rear.

(2)  A bicycle when in use or a person operating a bicycle at the times described in Section 41-6a-1603 shall be equipped with:

(a)  reflective material of sufficient size and reflectivity to be visible from both sides for 500 feet when directly in front of lawful lower beams of head lamps on a motor vehicle; or

(b)  a lamp that emits light visible from both sides from a distance of at least 500 feet.

(3)  A bicycle or a person operating a bicycle may be equipped with lamps or reflectors in addition to those required by Subsections (1) and (2).



Amended by Chapter 140, 2013 General Session

